dictionaries/isv_cyr_hunspell_dict.aff
SET UTF-8

TRY -ЈјЦцУуКкЕеНнГгШшЗзХхФфЫыВвАаПпРрОоЛлДдЖжЄєЧчСсМмИиТтЬьБбЊњЉљ

BREAK 1
BREAK =

NOSPLITSUGS

WORDCHARS -

FLAG long

COMPOUNDBEGIN xB
COMPOUNDEND xE
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG xP
ONLYINCOMPOUND xO

ICONV 4
ICONV њ нј
ICONV љ лј
ICONV нь нј
ICONV ль лј

MAP 10
MAP иі
MAP ђ(дж)
MAP ћ(ч)
MAP јй
MAP я(ја)
MAP ю(ју)
MAP ї(ји)
MAP эе
MAP ј'ъ
MAP ъа

REP 38
REP е є
REP е ы
REP и ы
REP ы и
REP е је
REP ы е
REP л лј
REP с сс
REP є е
REP лјенје јенје
REP туты тутој
REP ј ју
REP ог ого
REP в у
REP є је
REP је є
REP ы ј
REP једны једин
REP оро ра
REP оло ла
REP системом системоју
REP гледа гледє
REP гледа гледи
REP кров крв
REP ческы чскы
REP где кде
REP немеческ нємечск
REP дабы да_бы
REP леј љев
REP са _се
REP сја _се
REP недолго не_долго
REP ии ији
REP софии зофији
REP свјат свет
REP ого ојего
REP стч шч
REP шт шч

PFX zz Y 1
PFX zz 0 нај .

SFX AA Y 80
SFX AA ти л .
SFX AA ти ла .
SFX AA ти ло .
SFX AA ти ли .
SFX AA сати шу .
SFX AA сати шем .
SFX AA сати шеш .
SFX AA сати ше .
SFX AA сати шемо .
SFX AA сати шете .
SFX AA сати шут .
SFX AA ти х .
SFX AA ти ше .
SFX AA ти хмо .
SFX AA ти сте .
SFX AA ти ху .
SFX AA сати ши .
SFX AA сати шимо .
SFX AA сати шите .
SFX AA сати шучи .
SFX AA сати шучего .
SFX AA сати шучему .
SFX AA сати шучим .
SFX AA сати шучем .
SFX AA сати шучих .
SFX AA сати шучими .
SFX AA сати шуча .
SFX AA сати шучу .
SFX AA сати шучеј .
SFX AA сати шучеју .
SFX AA сати шуче .
SFX AA сати шемы .
SFX AA сати шемого .
SFX AA сати шемому .
SFX AA сати шемым .
SFX AA сати шемом .
SFX AA сати шемо .
SFX AA сати шема .
SFX AA сати шему .
SFX AA сати шемој .
SFX AA сати шемоју .
SFX AA сати шеми .
SFX AA сати шеме .
SFX AA сати шемых .
SFX AA сати шемым .
SFX AA сати шемыми .
SFX AA ти вши .
SFX AA ти вшего .
SFX AA ти вшему .
SFX AA ти вшим .
SFX AA ти вшем .
SFX AA ти вших .
SFX AA ти вшими .
SFX AA ти вша .
SFX AA ти вшу .
SFX AA ти вшеј .
SFX AA ти вшеју .
SFX AA ти вше .
SFX AA ти ны .
SFX AA ти ного .
SFX AA ти ному .
SFX AA ти ным .
SFX AA ти ном .
SFX AA ти ни .
SFX AA ти не .
SFX AA ти ных .
SFX AA ти ными .
SFX AA ти на .
SFX AA ти ну .
SFX AA ти ној .
SFX AA ти ноју .
SFX AA ти но .
SFX AA ти нје/xPxE .
SFX AA ти нја/xPxE .
SFX AA ти нју/xPxE .
SFX AA ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX AA ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX AA ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX AA ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX AA ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX AB Y 11
SFX AB 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AB а о/xPxBxO .
SFX AB а ы/xPxE .
SFX AB а у/xPxE .
SFX AB а 0 .
SFX AB а є/xPxE .
SFX AB 0 х/xPxE .
SFX AB 0 м/xPxE .
SFX AB а оју/xPxE .
SFX AB 0 ми/xPxE .
SFX AB а о/xPxE .

SFX AC Y 4
SFX AC то ого .
SFX AC то ом .
SFX AC то ому .
SFX AC то ым .

SFX AD Y 28
SFX AD 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AD ы о/xBxPxE .
SFX AD ы а/xPxE .
SFX AD ы ого/xPxE .
SFX AD ы у/xPxE .
SFX AD ы ој/xPxE .
SFX AD ы ом/xPxE .
SFX AD ы ому/xPxE .
SFX AD 0 м/xPxE .
SFX AD ы оју/xPxE .
SFX AD ы и/xPxE .
SFX AD ы е/xPxE .
SFX AD 0 х/xPxE .
SFX AD 0 ми/xPxE .
SFX AD кы ши/zz .
SFX AD кы шего/zz .
SFX AD кы шему/zz .
SFX AD кы шим/zz .
SFX AD кы шем/zz .
SFX AD кы ше/zz .
SFX AD кы ша/zz .
SFX AD кы шу/zz .
SFX AD кы шеј/zz .
SFX AD кы шеју/zz .
SFX AD кы ших/zz .
SFX AD кы шим/zz .
SFX AD кы шими/zz .
SFX AD кы је/zz .

SFX AE Y 28
SFX AE 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AE ы о/xBxPxE .
SFX AE ы а/xPxE .
SFX AE ы ого/xPxE .
SFX AE ы у/xPxE .
SFX AE ы ој/xPxE .
SFX AE ы ом/xPxE .
SFX AE ы ому/xPxE .
SFX AE 0 м/xPxE .
SFX AE ы оју/xPxE .
SFX AE ы и/xPxE .
SFX AE ы е/xPxE .
SFX AE 0 х/xPxE .
SFX AE 0 ми/xPxE .
SFX AE ликы чши/zz .
SFX AE ликы чшего/zz .
SFX AE ликы чшему/zz .
SFX AE ликы чшим/zz .
SFX AE ликы чшем/zz .
SFX AE ликы чше/zz .
SFX AE ликы чша/zz .
SFX AE ликы чшу/zz .
SFX AE ликы чшеј/zz .
SFX AE ликы чшеју/zz .
SFX AE ликы чших/zz .
SFX AE ликы чшим/zz .
SFX AE ликы чшими/zz .
SFX AE ликы че/xPxE .

SFX AF Y 99
SFX AF ти л .
SFX AF ти ла .
SFX AF ти ло .
SFX AF ти ли .
SFX AF ти ју .
SFX AF ти м .
SFX AF ти јеш .
SFX AF ти ш .
SFX AF ти је .
SFX AF ти 0 .
SFX AF ти јемо .
SFX AF ти мо .
SFX AF ти јете .
SFX AF и е .
SFX AF ти јут .
SFX AF ти х .
SFX AF ти ше .
SFX AF ти хмо .
SFX AF ти сте .
SFX AF ти ху .
SFX AF ти ј .
SFX AF ти јмо .
SFX AF ти јте .
SFX AF ти јучи .
SFX AF ти јучего .
SFX AF ти јучему .
SFX AF ти јучим .
SFX AF ти јучем .
SFX AF ти јучих .
SFX AF ти јучими .
SFX AF ти јуча .
SFX AF ти јучу .
SFX AF ти јучеј .
SFX AF ти јучеју .
SFX AF ти јуче .
SFX AF ти јемы .
SFX AF ти јемого .
SFX AF ти јемому .
SFX AF ти јемым .
SFX AF ти јемом .
SFX AF ти јемо .
SFX AF ти јема .
SFX AF ти јему .
SFX AF ти јемој .
SFX AF ти јемоју .
SFX AF ти јеми .
SFX AF ти јеме .
SFX AF ти јемых .
SFX AF ти јемым .
SFX AF ти јемыми .
SFX AF ти мы .
SFX AF ти мого .
SFX AF ти мому .
SFX AF ти мым .
SFX AF ти мом .
SFX AF ти мо .
SFX AF ти ма .
SFX AF ти му .
SFX AF ти мој .
SFX AF ти моју .
SFX AF ти ми .
SFX AF ти ме .
SFX AF ти мых .
SFX AF ти мым .
SFX AF ти мыми .
SFX AF ти вши .
SFX AF ти вшего .
SFX AF ти вшему .
SFX AF ти вшим .
SFX AF ти вшем .
SFX AF ти вших .
SFX AF ти вшими .
SFX AF ти вша .
SFX AF ти вшу .
SFX AF ти вшеј .
SFX AF ти вшеју .
SFX AF ти вше .
SFX AF ти ны .
SFX AF ти ного .
SFX AF ти ному .
SFX AF ти ным .
SFX AF ти ном .
SFX AF ти ни .
SFX AF ти не .
SFX AF ти ных .
SFX AF ти ными .
SFX AF ти на .
SFX AF ти ну .
SFX AF ти ној .
SFX AF ти ноју .
SFX AF ти но .
SFX AF ти нје/xPxE .
SFX AF ти нја/xPxE .
SFX AF ти нју/xPxE .
SFX AF ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX AF ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX AF ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX AF ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX AF ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX AG Y 5
SFX AG 0 0/xPxE .
SFX AG о о/xPxBxO .
SFX AG о а/xPxE .
SFX AG о у/xPxE .
SFX AG 0 м/xPxE .

SFX AH Y 80
SFX AH ти л .
SFX AH ти ла .
SFX AH ти ло .
SFX AH ти ли .
SFX AH овати ују .
SFX AH овати ујем .
SFX AH овати ујеш .
SFX AH овати ује .
SFX AH овати ујемо .
SFX AH овати ујете .
SFX AH овати ујут .
SFX AH ти х .
SFX AH ти ше .
SFX AH ти хмо .
SFX AH ти сте .
SFX AH ти ху .
SFX AH овати уј .
SFX AH овати ујмо .
SFX AH овати ујте .
SFX AH овати ујучи .
SFX AH овати ујучего .
SFX AH овати ујучему .
SFX AH овати ујучим .
SFX AH овати ујучем .
SFX AH овати ујучих .
SFX AH овати ујучими .
SFX AH овати ујуча .
SFX AH овати ујучу .
SFX AH овати ујучеј .
SFX AH овати ујучеју .
SFX AH овати ујуче .
SFX AH овати ујемы .
SFX AH овати ујемого .
SFX AH овати ујемому .
SFX AH овати ујемым .
SFX AH овати ујемом .
SFX AH овати ујемо .
SFX AH овати ујема .
SFX AH овати ујему .
SFX AH овати ујемој .
SFX AH овати ујемоју .
SFX AH овати ујеми .
SFX AH овати ујеме .
SFX AH овати ујемых .
SFX AH овати ујемым .
SFX AH овати ујемыми .
SFX AH ти вши .
SFX AH ти вшего .
SFX AH ти вшему .
SFX AH ти вшим .
SFX AH ти вшем .
SFX AH ти вших .
SFX AH ти вшими .
SFX AH ти вша .
SFX AH ти вшу .
SFX AH ти вшеј .
SFX AH ти вшеју .
SFX AH ти вше .
SFX AH ти ны .
SFX AH ти ного .
SFX AH ти ному .
SFX AH ти ным .
SFX AH ти ном .
SFX AH ти ни .
SFX AH ти не .
SFX AH ти ных .
SFX AH ти ными .
SFX AH ти на .
SFX AH ти ну .
SFX AH ти ној .
SFX AH ти ноју .
SFX AH ти но .
SFX AH ти нје/xPxE .
SFX AH ти нја/xPxE .
SFX AH ти нју/xPxE .
SFX AH ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX AH ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX AH ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX AH ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX AH ти нјах/xPxE .
