dictionaries/isv_cyr_hunspell_dict.dic
описати/AA
никто/AC
тежкы/AD
великы/AE
апеловати/AH
амбасада/AB
процитовати/AH
писати/AA
инокто/AC
музика/AB
колонизовати/AH
инженјерство/AG
дуга/AB
лимитовати/AH
покушати/AF
лука/AB
желєзо/AG
сова/AB
филмовати/AH
воздржати/AF
планета/AB
чловєчство/AG
плановати/AH
гроза/AB
извалјнјати/AF
учестничство/AG
процедура/AB
конкуровати/AH
конфисковати/AH
математика/AB
заблоковати/AH
написати/AA
ураза/AB
размєшати/AF
противдєјство/AG
рабство/AG
потврджати/AF
страховати/AH
низина/AB
решта/AB
комуниковати/AH
система/AB
одвага/AB
тестовати/AH
мєлкы/AD
поступати/AF
косово/AG
ремонтовати/AH
цєна/AB
тенкы/AD
избудовати/AH
христијанство/AG
избєгати/AF
фигура/AB
характеристика/AB
всекто/AC
вплывати/AF
звєзда/AB
трєбовати/AH
привитати/AF
могыла/AB
регистровати/AH
губа/AB
одповєдати/AF
чесати/AA
равнина/AB
срєбро/AG
реконструовати/AH
порно/AG
разпушчати/AF
колбаса/AB
горкы/AD
брада/AB
кава/AB
хватати/AF
гравировати/AH
машина/AB
нафта/AB
маршировати/AH
класификовати/AH
давати/AF
жена/AB
премиера/AB
цєловати/AH
оддєлјати/AF
злато/AG
подписати/AA
синтакса/AB
пожртвовати/AH
посрєдковати/AH
опекати/AF
задоволјство/AG
забава/AB
именовати/AH
прєправјати/AF
хвороба/AB
судба/AB
ударјати/AF
успосабјати/AF
пружина/AB
треновати/AH
анализовати/AH
крєпкы/AD
газета/AB
нєкто/AC
поддавати/AF
егзистовати/AH
попивати/AF
сестринство/AG
усиловати/AH
плата/AB
хлапство/AG
фотографовати/AH
језыковєдство/AG
монета/AB
одплачати/AF
одкушати/AF
словјанство/AG
кривовєрство/AG
соната/AB
експлодовати/AH
дєтинство/AG
конструовати/AH
импортовати/AH
номиновати/AH
манипуловати/AH
сєно/AG
выдра/AB
евакуовати/AH
суработничство/AG
совєтничство/AG
намєрјати/AF
обслуговати/AH
посрєдничство/AG
увага/AB
округлјати/AF
протєкати/AF
сбудовати/AH
изјежджати/AF
прєименовати/AH
списати/AA
записати/AA
прєписати/AA
обдарјати/AF
проламывати/AF
размонтовати/AH
руда/AB
изселјати/AF
спотрєбовати/AH
екипа/AB
руковати/AH
разочаровывати/AF
неспокојство/AG
мароко/AG
дєвичство/AG
дописывати/AF
народобијство/AG
родобијство/AG
абоновати/AH
духовенство/AG
вписати/AA
растлина/AB
демонстровати/AH
одчитывати/AF
прєдсєдателјство/AG
допушчати/AF
дузина/AB
дворјанство/AG
ентузиазмовати/AH
граджанство/AG
истина/AB
изсылати/AF
јединство/AG
клиентство/AG
кулминовати/AH
лјудство/AG
маленјкы/AD
младечство/AG
молва/AB
наслєдовати/AH
одсутство/AG
оплакывати/AF
словјанизовати/AH
пижама/AB
подкуповати/AH
подкупство/AG
покладати/AF
природа/AB
присутство/AG
привыкати/AF
програмовати/AH
радничство/AG
работничство/AG
родство/AG
рыболовство/AG
сконфисковати/AH
соучестничство/AG
спокојство/AG
сутрудничство/AG
споминати/AF
супруга/AB
тепло/AG
вечерјати/AF
виноградство/AG
водителјство/AG
водство/AG
заблуда/AB
записати/AA
сдавати/AF
здравотничство/AG
сухармонизовати/AH
бочва/AB
јествовати/AH
лјудобијство/AG
порота/AB
теплота/AB
тримати/AF
даунлодовати/AH
писати/AA
компјутеризовати/AH
виолина/AB
ограничати/AF
задрживати/AF
преферовати/AH
земједєлство/AG
изгода/AB
замєшати/AF
характеризовати/AH
скомбиновати/AH
авторство/AG
авиакарта/AB
детелина/AB
доживети/AF
двуженство/AG
гыбкы/AD
изрубывати/AF
једнобожство/AG
логовати/AH
лјудоједство/AG
многобожство/AG
незадовалјати/AF
несгода/AB
опекунство/AG
оплоджати/AF
поползати/AF
пригыбати/AF
приписати/AA
разкладати/AF
рокировати/AH
сливати/AF
сполупрацовати/AH
статистика/AB
удєлјати/AF
устројство/AG
воздвигати/AF
изгнанство/AG
жаркы/AD
жужати/AF
легализовати/AH
адоптовати/AH
генеза/AB
једноженство/AG
језыкознавство/AG
кориговати/AH
одказывати/AF
провргати/AF
студиовати/AH
домыслјати/AF
мєшчанство/AG
оптика/AB
поразумєти/AF
вникати/AF
пола/AB
припушчати/AF
изслєдовати/AH
начртати/AF
првородство/AG
заработывати/AF
простата/AB
поступати/AF
притворство/AG
производство/AG
прєвладывати/AF
шарлатанство/AG
ознанјати/AF
звєздознавство/AG
обжерство/AG
панчоха/AB
лєпкы/AD
клејкы/AD
хомогенизовати/AH
валторна/AB
кухарство/AG
печетарство/AG
одтискати/AF
јога/AB
возимати/AF
абстраховати/AH
активовати/AH
акушерство/AG
амеба/AB
балзамовати/AH
брно/AG
деблоковати/AH
дєлба/AB
дєвство/AG
дыхтєти/AF
формовати/AH
глухота/AB
идеализовати/AH
јагнетина/AB
јаркы/AD
коничина/AB
кресати/AF
крєхкы/AD
куропатва/AB
лукавство/AG
мєсечина/AB
млєзиво/AG
накыдати/AF
непријателјство/AG
обламывати/AF
обнова/AB
одписати/AA
одсланјати/AF
ослабєти/AF
ознаменовати/AH
разчесати/AA
разгрызати/AF
разлука/AB
разшчепјати/AF
тонкы/AD
ваза/AB
вербовати/AH
жгага/AB
изопачати/AF
супа/AB
рымовати/AH
лихварство/AG
мученичство/AG
пиратство/AG
антена/AB
зажигати/AF
потомство/AG
флиртовати/AH
приучати/AF
окарина/AB
измагателјство/AG
загладжати/AF
разковывати/AF
ампутовати/AH
ода/AB
издавати/AF
спозднјати/AF
бракониерство/AG
сортовати/AH
негыбкы/AD
потресати/AF
злорадовати/AH
панорама/AB
суперничство/AG
једнина/AB
документовати/AH
прєдписати/AA
дискредитовати/AH
плјама/AB
прєдавство/AG
присегати/AF
сфера/AB
невтрализовати/AH
декламовати/AH
пчеларство/AG
капела/AB
тесати/AA
апокалипса/AB
транскрибовати/AH
зашчичати/AF
околоровати/AH
видеокарта/AB
довєрјати/AF
заплановати/AH
